hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízvezeték-szerelvények és -támasztékok: Tömítések és O-gyűrűk; Falba épített hordozók és rögzítőkeretek; Fúvókák; Csőadapterek és szimeringek; Csősapkák és dugók; Csőcsatlakozók; Vízvezeték-karimák; Vízvezeték-csőbilincsek; Vízvezeték-szabályzók; Vízvezetékszelepek
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Loodgietersbenodigdheden: Afdichtingen voor loodgieterswerk; Dragers en montageframes voor muurinbouw; Mondstukken; Buisverbindings- en koppelstukken; Afdichtstoppen en -pluggen; Koppelstukken; Flenzen voor loodgieterswerk; Buisklemmen voor loodgieterswerk; Afvoerbegrenzers; Leidingkranen
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Plumbing Fittings & Supports: Gaskets & O-Rings; In-Wall Carriers & Mounting Frames; Nozzles; Pipe Adapters & Bushings; Pipe Caps & Plugs; Pipe Connectors; Plumbing Flanges; Plumbing Pipe Clamps; Plumbing Regulators; Plumbing Valves
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Vodovodné armatúry a podpery: Tesnenia a O-krúžky; Nástenné nosiče a montážne rámy; Trysky; Potrubné adaptéry a objímky; Uzávery a zátky potrubí; Konektory potrubia; Vodovodné príruby; Svorky na vodovodné potrubie; Vodovodné regulátory; Vodovodné ventily
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > ที่ติดตั้งระบบท่อ: ปะเก็นและโอริง; เฟรมยึดอุปกรณ์ในผนัง; หัวฉีด; อะแดปเตอร์และปลอกท่อ; ฝาปิดและปลั๊กอุดท่อน้ำ; ข้อต่อท่อประปา; หน้าแปลนท่อ; แคลมป์จับท่อ; อุปกรณ์ควบคุมการไหลเวียนของน้ำ; วาล์วระบบท่อ
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Rohrverbindungsstücke & -halterungen: Dichtungen & O-Ringe; In der Wand verbaute Trägerleisten; Düsen; Rohranschlüsse & Reduzierstücke; Rohrkappen & -verschlüsse; Rohrverbinder; Rohrflansche; Rohrschellen; Druckminderer; Ventile
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 水管配件/支架: 垫圈/O形圈; 壁挂承重器/安装支架; 接管; 转换接头; 管帽/管塞; 管接头; 管道法兰; 管夹; 管道减压阀; 管道阀
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Rørstykker: Rørpakninger; Indbygningscisterner og monteringsrammer; Dyser; Røradaptere og bøsninger; Rørhætter og -propper; Rørforbindere; Studser; Rørtvinger; Sanitetsregulatorer; Rørventiler
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Фитинги и крепления для труб: Сантехнические прокладки; Система инсталляции и монтажные рамы; Штуцеры; Переходники и футорки для труб; Заглушки для труб; Соединители для труб; Сантехнические фланцы; Хомуты для сантехнических труб; Регулирующая водопроводная арматура; Запорная водопроводная арматура
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Vodovodne armature in nosilci: Tesnila in tesnilni obroči; Vgradni nosilci in montažni okvirji; Šobe; Priključki in podložke za cevi; Pokrovčki in čepi za cevi; Cevni priključki; Cevne prirobnice; Objemke za vodovodne cevi; Vodovodni regulatorji tlaka; Vodovodni ventili
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 배관 부속품/지지대: 개스킷/오링; 내벽 캐리어/마운팅 프레임; 노즐; 파이프 어댑터/부싱; 파이프 덮개/마개; 파이프 이음쇠; 배관 플랜지; 배관 파이프 클램프; 배관 레귤레이터; 배관 밸브
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Santechnikos detalės ir atramos: Tarpinės ir sandarinimo žiedai; Sieniniai laikikliai ir montavimo rėmai; Purkštukai; Vamzdžių adapteriai ir įvorės; Vamzdžių dangteliai ir kamščiai; Vamzdžių jungtys; Santechninės jungės; Vandentiekio vamzdžių spaustukai; Santechniniai reguliatoriai; Santechniniai vožtuvai
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > 配管部品: パッキン・ガスケット; 壁埋込用フレーム; ノズル; パイプアダプター・ブッシング; パイプ用キャップ・栓; パイプ継手; フランジ; パイプクランプ; 水圧調整レギュレータ; 配管バルブ
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Vodovodní armatury: Těsnění a o-kroužky; Montážní rámy a předstěnové systémy; Trysky; Redukce na potrubí; Krytky a zátky na potrubí; Spojky na potrubí; Instalatérské příruby; Spony na potrubí; Instalatérské regulátory; Instalatérské ventily
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Водопроводни фитинги и опори: Уплътнения и О-пръстени; Вградени казанчета и монтажни рамки; Дюзи; Тръбни адаптери и втулки; Капачки и тапи за тръби; Съединителни муфи; ВиК фланци; Скоби за водопроводни тръби; Водопроводни регулатори; Водопроводни кранове
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Ống - khớp nối: Đệm lót & vòng chữ O; Khung treo âm tường; Vòi; Đầu nối và ống lót; Nút & nắp ống; Khớp nối ống; Bích nối ống; Vòng kẹp ống nước; Bộ điều chỉnh ống nước; Van ống nước
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Fitinguri și suporturi sanitare: Garnituri și garnituri inelare; Suporturi montate în perete și rame de montare; Duze; Adaptoare și bucșe pentru țevi; Capace și dopuri pentru țevi; Conectori pentru țevi; Flanșe pentru instalații sanitare; Cleme pentru țevi sanitare; Regulatoare pentru instalații sanitare; Supape pentru instalații sanitare
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Vodovodni priključci i nosači: Brtve i O-prstenovi; Zidni nosači i okviri za montažu; Mlaznice; Adapteri i redukcije za cijevi; Poklopci i čepovi za cijevi; Priključci za cijevi; Vodoinstalacijske prirubnice; Obujmice za vodovodne cijevi; Vodovodni regulatori; Vodovodni ventili
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Encaixes e suportes de canalização: Juntas e O-Rings; Condutores In-Wall e estruturas de montagem; Bocais; Buchas e adaptadores de tubo; Bujões e tampas de tubo; Conectores de tubo; Flanges de canalização; Abraçadeiras de tubo de canalização; Reguladores de canalização; Válvulas de canalização
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Juntas e conexões para encanamento: Anéis de vedação; Estruturas de montagem embutidas; Bocais; Adaptadores e buchas para encanamento; Tampões e bujões para encanamento; Conectores para encanamento; Flanges para válvulas de escoamento; Abraçadeiras para encanamento; Reguladores para encanamento; Registros para encanamento
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Rørfester og -støtter: Pakninger og O-ringer; Integrerte bærere og monteringsrammer; Dyser; Røradaptere og -foringer; Rørhetter og -plugger; Rørtilkoblinger; Rørflenser; Rørklammer; Rørregulatorer; Rørventiler
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Accesorios de fontanería: Juntas y juntas tóricas; Bastidores y armazones de soporte para empotrado; Boquillas; Adaptadores de tuberías y boquillas; Tapones de tuberías; Conectores de tuberías; Bridas para fontanería; Abrazaderas de tuberías; Reguladores de fontanería; Válvulas de fontanería
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Putkien osat ja kiinnikkeet: Tiivisteet ja O-renkaat; Seinäkannattimet ja asennuskehikot; Suuttimet; Putkiadapterit ja -holkit; Putkitulpat; Putkiliittimet; Putkilaipat; Putki­kiinnikkeet; Putkisäätimet; Putkiventtiilit
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Supporti e raccordi per tubi: Guarnizioni idrauliche; Telai e supporti interni alle pareti; Ugelli; Adattatori e boccole tubi; Cappucci e tappi per tubi; Raccordi tubi; Flange idrauliche; Morsetti per tubi; Regolatori idraulici; Valvole idrauliche
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Sıhhi Tesisat Bağlantı Parçaları: Sıhhi Tesisat Contaları ve O Halkaları; Duvara Monte Taşıyıcılar ve Montaj Askıları; Hortum Başları; Boru Adaptörleri ve Burçları; Boru Tapaları ve Tıkaçları; Boru Bağlantı Elemanları; Boru Flanşları; Boru Kelepçeleri; Sıhhi Tesisat Regülatörleri; Sıhhi Tesisat Vanaları
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Εξαρτήματα & στηρίγματα υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων: Παρεμβύσματα & δακτύλιοι O; Εντοιχιζόμενες βάσεις & κουφώματα στήριξης; Ακροφύσια; Προσαρμογείς & δακτύλιοι σωλήνων; Καπάκια & βύσματα σωλήνων; Συνδετήρες σωλήνων; Φλάντζες σωλήνων υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων; Σφιγκτήρες σωλήνων υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων; Ρυθμιστές σωλήνων υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων; Βαλβίδες υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 管線接頭/支架: 墊圈/O型環; 嵌壁/支撐框架; 噴嘴; 水管轉接頭和套管; 管線蓋/塞; 水管接頭; 管路凸緣; 水管夾具; 水管調節器; 水閥
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Fixations et supports de plomberie: Joints d’étanchéité et joints toriques; Bâti-supports; Buses; Adaptateurs et raccords de tuyauterie; Bouchons mâles et femelles; Raccords de tuyauterie; Colliers de serrage de plomberie; Brides de fixation de plomberie; Régulateurs de plomberie; Soupapes de plomberie
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Rördelar: Rörpackningar; Väggfasta bärare och monteringsramar; Munstycken; Rörbussningar och övergångsnipplar; Rörhuvar och rörpluggar; Rörkopplingar; Rörflänsar; Rörklämmor; Rörregulatorer; Rörventiler
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Mocowania hydrauliczne: Uszczelki hydrauliczne; Stelaże i uchwyty do montowania w ścianie; Dysze; Przejściówki i łączniki hydrauliczne; Nasadki i zaślepki na rury; Złączki do rur; Kołnierze hydrauliczne; Zaciski na rury; Regulatory hydrauliczne; Zawory hydrauliczne